Hawaii statutes.
§281-74 Labels on containers. All
persons manufacturing any liquor for sale under this chapter shall securely and
permanently attach to every container thereof, as the same is manufactured, a
label stating the name of the manufacturer or, in lieu thereof, if the
manufacturer does business under another name, stating such name, and stating
the kind and quantity of liquor contained therein. Every container containing
liquor for sale by any person holding a wholesale or retail license shall have
securely and permanently attached to it such a label. In addition to the
foregoing requirements, all such labels shall conform in all respects to the
then existing federal laws and regulations regarding such labels.

Before attaching any label containing the name
by which the manufacturer does business, in lieu of the manufacturer's name,
the manufacturer shall first register such business name under chapter 482.
The manufacturer shall furnish to the liquor commission written confirmation of
such registration and such other information as may be deemed necessary or
appropriate by the liquor commission to enable it to establish and maintain
records to properly identify the manufacturer, its name or names by which it
does business and the liquor manufactured. The records so established and
maintained shall be available for public inspection. [L Sp 1933, c 40, §40; RL
1935, §2609; am L 1937, c 211, §18; RL 1945, §7262; RL 1955, §159-73; am L
1965, c 94, §1; HRS §281-74; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next